Washington statutes.
RCW 36.12.050

Vote required—Notice of result.

When the returns have been received and compared, and the results ascertained by the board, if three-fifths of the legal votes cast by those voting on the proposition are in favor of any particular place the proposition has been adopted. The board of county commissioners must give notice of the result by posting notices thereof in all the election precincts in the county.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.12.050. Prior: 1890 p 318 s 5; RRS s 4002.]